California statutes. Labor Code
(v) The Public Employment Relations Board may further prioritize the resolution of subcategories of cases within each of these categories, or within the group of cases not categorized above, to ensure the most efficient possible resolution of such cases and the maximum possible protection of
 employee rights.

(d) To pursue relief from the Public Employment Relations Board, a covered worker or their representative shall file both of the following with the Public Employment Relations Board:

(1) An unfair practice charge or petition that includes all of the following information:

(A) The charging party’s name, address, email address, and telephone number.

(B) The respondent’s name, address, email address, and telephone number.

(C) Where applicable, the original charge or petition filed with the National Labor Relations Board with all supporting documentation and evidence that was submitted to the National Labor Relations Board.

(D) All correspondence, communications, or other materials received by the charging party, or otherwise in the charging party’s possession, from the National Labor Relation’s Board regarding the original charge or petition filed with the National Labor Relation’s Board.

(2) The documentation and evidence filed with the Public Employment Relations Board shall not be served on the respondent.

(3) The Public Employment Relations Board shall hold the supporting documentation and evidence confidential and maintain it as part of its investigatory file.

(4) Documentation and evidence under paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to be public records for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(e) (1) In implementing this section, the Public Employment Relations Board may do all of the following pursuant to its own procedures:

(A) Conduct elections to determine whether a majority of workers in an appropriate bargaining unit have selected an exclusive representative for purposes of collective bargaining.

(B) Promptly certify an exclusive bargaining representative by determining whether a majority of workers in an appropriate bargaining unit have selected an exclusive representative for purposes of collective bargaining, and order that an employer bargain with that exclusive bargaining representative. Selection may be demonstrated through a previous certification by another state or federal agency, or through an election, or through other legal processes recognized by the Public Employment
 Relations Board or the National Labor Relations Board at that time the selection is made, or through a written designation. This shall include the ability to resolve pending objections or voter eligibility challenges in an election previously pending with the National Labor Relations Board.

(C) Order that an employer bargain with an exclusive bargaining representative and otherwise decide unfair labor practices and order all appropriate action and remedies.

(D) Order than an employer submit to binding arbitration to assist the parties in finalizing their negotiations for a collective bargaining agreement if the National Labor Relations Board or the Public Employment Relations Board has certified an exclusive bargaining representative, or if an employer has voluntarily recognized the exclusive bargaining representative of a group of workers, and more than six months have passed
 without the parties agreeing on and executing a collective bargaining agreement.

(E) Order any appropriate remedy, including injunctive relief and penalties, necessary to effectuate this section, including if an employer refuses to comply with an order under this section.

(2) The Public Employment Relations Board may rely on its own decisions and precedent under the National Labor Relations Act, and shall do so in a manner that most expansively effectuates the rights guaranteed under this section.

(3) The Public Employment Relations Board may order all appropriate relief for a violation of this section, including civil penalties. If the Public Employment Relations Board finds that an employer has engaged in a pattern or practice of committing unfair practices, it may assess civil penalties in the amount of one
 thousand dollars ($1,000) per worker per violation.

(4) Any action taken by the Public Employment Relations Board pursuant to this section may be reviewed by a state appellate court of competent jurisdiction. The decision of the court enforcing an order of the Public Employment Relations Board shall be final, subject to the right to petition the California Supreme Court for review, and the pendency of a petition for review shall not, except by express order of the courts, constitute a stay of the decision. The violation of a decision under this section shall be remediable by the court as contempt thereof.

(f) (1) The Public Employment Relations Board Enforcement Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(2) Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the
 Public Employment Relations Board Enforcement Fund.

(3) Moneys in the fund shall be available upon appropriation by the Legislature for the Public Employment Relations Board for purposes of administering this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Charging party” means the party bringing an unfair labor practice charge.

(2) “Respondent” means the party that allegedly committed the unfair labor practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 139, Sec. 2.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

925.

(a) An employer shall not require an employee who primarily resides and works in California, as a condition of employment, to agree to a provision that would do either of the following:

(1) Require the employee to adjudicate outside of California a claim arising in California.

(2) Deprive the employee of the substantive protection of California law with respect to a controversy arising in California.

(b) Any provision of a contract that violates subdivision (a) is voidable by the employee, and if a provision is rendered void at the request of the employee, the matter shall be
 adjudicated in California and California law shall govern the dispute.

(c) In addition to injunctive relief and any other remedies available, a court may award an employee who is enforcing his or her rights under this section reasonable attorney’s fees.

(d) For purposes of this section, adjudication includes litigation and arbitration.

(e) This section shall not apply to a contract with an employee who is in fact individually represented by legal counsel in negotiating the terms of an agreement to designate either the venue or forum in which a controversy arising from the employment contract may be adjudicated or the choice of law to be applied.

(f) This section shall apply to a contract entered into, modified, or extended on or after January 1,
 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   (SB 1241)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

926.

(a) A contract or contract term that violates Section 16608 of the Business and Professions Code is void as contrary to public policy only if entered into on or after January 1, 2026.

(b) A worker who has been subjected to the conduct prohibited by subdivision (b) of Section 16608 of the Business and Professions Code or a worker representative may bring a civil action on behalf of that worker, other persons similarly situated, or both, in any court of competent jurisdiction. 

(c) Any person found liable for a violation of this section shall be liable for actual damages sustained by the worker or workers on
 whose behalf the case is brought, or five thousand dollars ($5,000) per worker, whichever is greater, in addition to injunctive relief, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) This section does not limit the remedies available to a worker or other natural person specified in Section 16608 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 703, Sec. 2.   (AB 692)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

927.

(a) A provision in an agreement between an individual and any other person for the performance of personal or professional services is unenforceable only as it relates to a new performance, fixed on or after January 1, 2025, by a digital replica of the individual if the provision meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The provision allows for the creation and use of a digital replica of the individual’s voice or likeness in place of work the individual would otherwise have performed in person.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the provision does not include a reasonably
 specific description of the intended uses of the digital replica.

(B) Failure to include a reasonably specific description of the intended uses of a digital replica does not render the provision unenforceable if the uses are consistent with the terms of the contract for the performance of personal or professional services and the fundamental character of the photography or soundtrack as recorded or performed.

(3) The individual was not represented in any of the following manners:

(A) By legal counsel who negotiated on behalf of the individual licensing the individual’s digital replica rights, and the commercial terms are stated clearly and conspicuously in a contract
 or other writing signed or initialed by the individual.

(B) By a labor union representing workers who do the proposed work, and the terms of their collective bargaining agreement expressly addresses uses of digital replicas.

(b) This section does not affect provisions of a contract other than a provision that falls under subdivision (a) and does not impact, abrogate, or otherwise affect any exclusivity grants contained in, or related to, a provision subject to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) As used in this section, “digital replica” means a
 computer-generated, highly realistic electronic representation that is readily identifiable as the voice or visual likeness of an individual that is embodied in a sound recording, image, audiovisual work, or transmission in which the actual individual either did not actually perform or appear, or the actual individual did perform or appear, but the fundamental character of the performance or appearance has been materially altered.

(2) “Digital replica” does not include the electronic reproduction, use of a sample of one sound recording or audiovisual work into another, remixing, mastering, or digital remastering of a sound recording or audiovisual work authorized by the copyrightholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 2602)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Solicitation of Employees by Misrepresentation [970. - 977.]

970.

No person, or agent or officer thereof, directly or indirectly, shall influence, persuade, or engage any person to change from one place to another in this State or from any place outside to any place within the State, or from any place within the State to any place outside, for the purpose of working in any branch of labor, through or by means of knowingly false representations, whether spoken, written, or advertised in printed form, concerning either:

(a) The kind, character, or existence of such work;

(b) The length of time such work will last, or the compensation therefor;

(c) The sanitary or housing conditions relating to or surrounding the work;

(d) The existence or nonexistence of any strike, lockout, or other labor dispute affecting it and pending between the proposed employer and the persons then or last engaged in the performance of the labor for which the employee is sought.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

971.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who violates Section 970 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for not more than six months or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 197.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

In addition to such criminal penalty, any person, or agent or officer thereof who violates any provision of Section 970 is liable to the party aggrieved, in a civil action, for double damages resulting from such misrepresentations. Such civil action may be brought by an aggrieved person or his assigns or successors in interest, without first establishing any criminal liability.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

973.

If any person advertises for, or seeks employees by means of newspapers, posters, letters, or otherwise, or solicits or communicates by letter or otherwise with persons to work for him or the person for whom he is acting, or to work at any shop, plant, or establishment while a strike, lockout, or other trade dispute is still in active progress at such shop, plant, or establishment, he shall plainly and explicitly mention in such advertisement or oral or written solicitations or communications that a strike, lockout, or other labor disturbance exists.

The person inserting any such advertisement, solicitation, or communication in a newspaper, on a poster, or otherwise, shall insert in such advertisement, solicitation or communication his own name and, if he is representing another, the name of the person he is representing and at whose direction and under whose authority he is inserting the advertisement, solicitation or communication. The appearance of this name in connection with such advertisement, solicitation or communication is prima facie evidence as to the person responsible for the advertisement, solicitation or communication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 281.)
-------------------------------------------

974.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who violates Section 973 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------

976.

No person shall publish or cause to be published any advertisement, solicitation or communication in any newspaper, poster or letter, offering employment as a salesman, broker or agent, whether as an employee or independent contractor, which advertisement, solicitation or communication (a) is willfully designed to mislead any person as to compensation or commissions which may be earned; or (b) falsely represents the compensation or commissions which may be earned.

This section shall not be applicable to any publisher of a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, who publishes an advertisement, solicitation or communication in good faith, without knowledge of its false, deceptive or misleading character.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 243.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who violates Section 976 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1583.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Employer Use of Social Media [980. - 980.]

980.

(a) As used in this chapter, “social media” means an electronic service or account, or electronic content, including, but not limited to, videos, still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts, instant and text messages, email, online services or accounts, or Internet Web site profiles or locations.

(b) An employer shall not require or request an employee or applicant for employment to do any of the following:

(1) Disclose a username or password for the purpose of accessing personal social media.

(2) Access personal social media in the presence of the employer.

(3) Divulge
 any personal social media, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) Nothing in this section shall affect an employer’s existing rights and obligations to request an employee to divulge personal social media reasonably believed to be relevant to an investigation of allegations of employee misconduct or employee violation of applicable laws and regulations, provided that the social media is used solely for purposes of that investigation or a related proceeding.

(d) Nothing in this section precludes an employer from requiring or requesting an employee to disclose a username, password, or other method for the purpose of accessing an employer-issued electronic device.

(e) An employer shall not discharge, discipline, threaten to discharge or discipline, or otherwise retaliate against an employee or applicant for not
 complying with a request or demand by the employer that violates this section. However, this section does not prohibit an employer from terminating or otherwise taking an adverse action against an employee or applicant if otherwise permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 142.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Class of Labor Employed; Labor Union Insignia [1010. - 1018.]

1010.

As used in this chapter “label” includes label, imprint, trade-mark, tag, stamp, inscription, or other device.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

A person engaged in the production, manufacture, or sale of any article of merchandise in this state, shall not, by any label placed or impressed upon such article, or upon its container, misrepresent or falsely state any of the following as to the production of such article:

(a) The kind, character, or nature of the labor employed.

(b) The extent of the labor employed.

(c) The number or kind of persons exclusively employed.

(d) That a particular or distinctive class or character of laborers was wholly and exclusively employed, when in fact another class, or character, or distinction of laborers was used or employed either jointly or in anywise supplementary to such exclusive class, character, or distinction of laborers.

Violation of any provision of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not less than 20 nor more than 90 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 198.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

Any person engaged in the production, manufacture, or sale of any article of merchandise in this state, or any person engaged in the performance of any acts or services of a private, public, or quasi-public nature for profit, who willfully misrepresents or falsely states that members of trades unions, labor associations, or labor organizations were engaged or employed in the manufacture, production, or sale of such article or in the performance of such acts or services, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 90 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 199.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

As used in this chapter “forge” means forge, reproduce, copy, imitate, or counterfeit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1014.

Any trade union, labor association, or labor organization, organized and existing in this State, which has adopted and registered a label or trademark in accordance with the law of this State, has the exclusive right to the ownership, use, and control of such label or trademark.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1015.

Any person who, without having an unrevoked written authority from such trade union, labor association or labor organization, willfully forges or procures to be forged such label or trademark, with intent to sell or assist other persons to sell, any goods to which such forged label is affixed as having been made, manufactured, or produced in whole or in part by labor, laborers, or employees who are members of, or allied or associated with, such trade union, labor association, or labor organization, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 200.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.

Any person who willfully uses or displays the genuine label, trademark, insignia, seal, device, or form of advertisement of any association or labor union, in any manner not authorized by such association or labor organization or not in conformity with the bylaws thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisonment for not more than three months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 201.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

Any person who wilfully uses the card of any labor union to obtain aid, assistance, or employment, unless entitled to use such card under the rules and regulations of a labor union within this State is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1018.

Any person who willfully wears the button of any labor union of this state, unless entitled to wear the button under the rules of such union, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 20 days or by a fine of not more than forty dollars ($40), or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 202.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.1. Unfair Immigration-Related Practices [1019. - 1019.4.]

1019.

(a) It is unlawful for an employer or any other person or entity to engage in, or to direct another person or entity to engage in, unfair immigration-related practices against any person for the purpose of, or with the intent of, retaliating against any person for exercising any right protected under this code or by any local ordinance applicable to employees. Exercising a right protected by this code or local ordinance includes the following:

(1) Filing a complaint or informing any person of an employer’s or other party’s alleged violation of this code or local ordinance, so long as the complaint or disclosure is made in good faith.

(2) Seeking information
 regarding whether an employer or other party is in compliance with this code or local ordinance.

(3) Informing a person of his or her potential rights and remedies under this code or local ordinance, and assisting him or her in asserting those rights.

(b) (1) As used in this chapter, “unfair immigration-related practice” means any of the following practices, when undertaken for the retaliatory purposes prohibited by subdivision (a):

(A) Requesting more or different documents than are required under Section 1324a(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code, or a refusal to honor documents tendered pursuant to that section that on their face reasonably appear to be genuine.

(B) Using the federal E-Verify system to check the employment
 authorization status of a person at a time or in a manner not required under Section 1324a(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code, or not authorized under any memorandum of understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system.

(C) Threatening to file or the filing of a false police report, or a false report or complaint with any state or federal agency.

(D) Threatening to contact or contacting immigration authorities.

(2) “Unfair immigration-related practice” does not include conduct undertaken at the express and specific direction or request of the federal government.

(c) Engaging in an unfair immigration-related practice against a person within 90 days of the person’s exercise of rights protected under this code or local ordinance
 applicable to employees shall raise a rebuttable presumption of having done so in retaliation for the exercise of those rights.

(d) (1) An employee or other person who is the subject of an unfair immigration-related practice prohibited by this section, or a representative of that employee or person, may bring a civil action for equitable relief and any applicable damages or penalties.

(2) Upon a finding by a court of applicable jurisdiction of a violation of this section, upon application by a party or on its own motion, a court may do the following:

(A) For a first violation, order the appropriate government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the violating party for a period of up to 14 days. On receipt of the court’s order and notwithstanding any other law, the appropriate
 agencies shall suspend the licenses according to the court’s order.

(B) For a second violation, order the appropriate government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the violating party for a period of up to 30 days. On receipt of the court’s order and notwithstanding any other law, the appropriate agencies shall immediately suspend the licenses.

(C) For a third or subsequent violation, order the appropriate government agencies to suspend for a period of up to 90 days all licenses that are held by the violating party. On receipt of the court’s order and notwithstanding any other law, the appropriate agencies shall immediately suspend the licenses.

(3) In determining whether a suspension of all licenses is appropriate under this subdivision, the court shall consider whether the employer knowingly
 committed an unfair immigration-related practice, the good faith efforts of the employer to resolve any alleged unfair immigration-related practice after receiving notice of the violations, as well as the harm other employees of the employer, or employees of other employers on a multiemployer job site, will suffer as a result of the suspension of all licenses.

(4) An employee or other person who is the subject of an unfair immigration-related practice prohibited by this section, and who prevails in an action authorized by this section, shall recover his or her reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including any expert witness costs.

(e) As used in this chapter:

(1) “License” means any agency permit, certificate, approval, registration, or charter that is required by law and that is issued by any agency for the
 purposes of operating a business in this state and that is specific to the business location or locations where the unfair immigration-related practice occurred. “License” does not include a professional license.

(2) “Violation” means each incident when an unfair immigration-related practice was committed, without reference to the number of employees involved in the incident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 375.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.1.

(a) It is unlawful for an employer, in the course of satisfying the requirements of Section 1324a(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code, to do any of the following: 

(1) Request more or different documents than are required under Section 1324a(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) Refuse to honor documents tendered that on their face reasonably appear to be genuine.

(3) Refuse to honor documents or work authorization based upon the specific status or term of status that accompanies the authorization to work.

(4) Attempt to reinvestigate or reverify an incumbent employee’s authorization to
 work using an unfair immigration-related practice.

(b) (1) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a penalty imposed by the Labor Commissioner and liability for equitable relief.

(2) An applicant for employment or an employee who is subject to an unlawful act that is prohibited by this section, or a representative of that applicant for employment or employee, may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement pursuant to Section 98.7.

(3) The penalty recoverable by the applicant or employee, or by the Labor Commissioner, for a violation of this section shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   (SB 1001)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.2.

(a) Except as otherwise required by federal law, a public or private employer, or a person acting on behalf of a public or private employer, shall not reverify the employment eligibility of a current employee at a time or in a manner not required by Section 1324a(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an employer who violates subdivision (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The penalty shall be recoverable by the Labor Commissioner.

(2) The actions of an employer that violate subdivision (a) and result in a
 civil penalty under paragraph (1) shall not also form the basis for liability or penalty under Section 1019.1.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall be interpreted and applied consistent with federal law and regulations. This section does not prohibit an employer from doing any of the following:

(1) Reverifying an employees’ employment authorization in a time and manner consistent with Section 274a.2(b)(1)(vii) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Taking any lawful action to review the employment authorization of an employee upon knowing that the employee is, or has become, unauthorized to be employed in the United States, consistent with Section 1324a(a)(2) of Title 8 of the United States Code, including in response to
 specific and detailed information from any agency within the United States Department of Homeland Security indicating that an employee is not authorized to be employed in the United States.

(3) Reminding an employee, at least 90 days before the date reverification is required, that the employee will be required to present a document identified in List A or a combination of one document from List B and one document from List C, as required by the I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification Form, showing continued employment authorization on the date that their current employment authorization will expire or on the date that their current documentation will expire, whichever date is sooner.

(4) Taking any lawful action to correct errors or omissions in a missing or incomplete I-9
 Employment Eligibility Verification Form.

(d) In accordance with state and federal law, nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted, construed, or applied to restrict or limit an employer’s compliance with a memorandum of understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term “knowing” is defined as set forth in Section 274a.1(l) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations and as interpreted by applicable federal rules, regulations, and controlling federal case law. The term “knowing” includes not only actual knowledge, but also knowledge that may fairly be inferred through notice of certain facts and circumstances that would lead a person, through the exercise of reasonable care, to know about a certain condition.
 Constructive knowledge may be found under the circumstances described in Section 274a.1(l)(2) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations and may not be inferred from an employee’s foreign appearance or accent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 364, Sec. 10.   (SB 112)   Effective September 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.4.

For purposes of this chapter, the terms “reverify” or “reverifying” mean the actions described in Section 274a.2(b)(1)(vii) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations. These terms shall be interpreted consistently with any applicable federal rules, regulations, and controlling federal case law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 364, Sec. 11.   (SB 112)   Effective September 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Contractors [1020. - 1024.]

1020.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to establish a citation system for the imposition of prompt and effective civil sanctions against violators of the laws and regulations of this state relating to the employment of workers by unlicensed contractors and the utilization of unlicensed contractors and other persons who are not valid independent contractors by licensed contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.

Any person who does not hold a valid state contractor’s license issued pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and who employs any worker to perform services for which a license is required, shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) per employee for each day of employment. The civil penalties provided for by this section are in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 329, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.5.

Any person who holds a valid state contractor’s license issued pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and who willingly and knowingly enters into a contract with any person to perform services for which a license is required as an independent contractor, and that person does not meet the burden of proof of independent contractor status pursuant to Section 2750.5 or hold a valid state contractor’s license, shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) per person so contracted with for each day of the contract. The civil penalties provided for by this section are in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 329, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

If upon inspection or investigation the Labor Commissioner determines that any person is employing workers in violation of Section 1021 or 1021.5, he or she may issue a citation to the person in violation. The citation may be served personally or by registered mail in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe the nature of the violation, including reference to the statutory provision alleged to have been violated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 761, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.

(a) If a person desires to contest a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty therefor, he or she shall within 15 business days after service of the citation notify the office of the Labor Commissioner which appears on the citation of his or her request for an informal hearing. The Labor Commissioner or his or her deputy or agent shall, within 30 days, hold a hearing at the conclusion of which the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty shall be affirmed, modified, or dismissed. The decision of the Labor Commissioner shall consist of a notice of findings, findings, and order which shall be served on all parties to the hearing within 15 days after the hearing by regular first-class mail at the last known address of the party on file with the Labor Commissioner. Service shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any amount found due by the Labor Commissioner as a result of a hearing shall become due and payable 45 days after notice of the findings and written findings and order have been mailed to the party assessed. A writ of mandate may be taken from that finding to the appropriate superior court, as long as the party agrees to pay any judgment and costs ultimately rendered by the court against the party for the assessment. The writ shall be taken within 45 days of service of the notice of findings, findings, and order thereon.

(b) A person to whom a citation has been issued, shall, in lieu of contesting a citation pursuant to this section, transmit to the office of the Labor Commissioner designated on the citation the amount specified for the violation within 15 business days after issuance of the citation.

(c) When no petition objecting to a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty is filed, a certified copy of the citation or proposed civil penalty may be filed by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty.

(d) When findings and the order thereon are made affirming or modifying a citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty after hearing, a certified copy of the findings and the order entered thereon may be entered by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the certified order.

(e) A judgment entered pursuant to this section shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and be given the same preference allowed by law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes. The clerk shall make no charge for the service provided by this section to be performed by him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 96, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide for the prompt and effective enforcement of labor laws relating to the construction industry.

(b) Before July 1, 2013, all civil penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Industrial Relations Construction Industry Enforcement Fund. All moneys in the fund shall be used for the purpose of enforcing this chapter, as appropriated by the Legislature.

(c) On or after July 1, 2013, all civil penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Labor Enforcement and Compliance
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 38.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. Employer Use of Consumer Credit Reports [1024.5. - 1024.6.]

1024.5.

(a) An employer or prospective employer shall not use a consumer credit report for employment purposes unless the position of the person for whom the report is sought is any of the following:

(1) A managerial position.

(2) A position in the state Department of Justice.

(3) That of a sworn peace officer or other law enforcement position.

(4) A position for which the information contained in the report is required by law to be disclosed or obtained.
